dictsource/os_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Ossetian

// Consonants
.L01  б в г гъ д дж дз ж з й к къ л м н п пъ р с т тъ ф х хъ ц цъ ч чъ ш щ

.group а
        а        a
		а  (_   'a
		а  (L01_ 'a
		а  (L01L01_ 'a
		
.group ӕ
        ӕ        @
		ӕ  (_   '@
		ӕ  (L01_ '@
		ӕ  (L01L01_ '@
		
.group б
        б        b
		
.group в
        в        v
		
.group г
        г        g
		гъ       Q"
		
.group д
        д        d
		дж       dZ
		дз       dz
		
.group е
        е        e
		е  (_   'e
		е  (L01_ 'e
		е  (L01L01_ 'e
		
.group ё
        ё        jo
		ё  (_    j'o
		ё  (L01_ j'o
		ё  (L01L01_ j'o
		
.group ж
        ж        Z
		
.group з
        з        Z


.group и
        и        i
		и  (_   'i
		и  (L01_ 'i
		и  (L01L01_ 'i
		
.group й
        й        j
		
.group к
        к        k
		къ       k?
		
.group л
        л        l
		
.group м
        м        m
		
.group н
        н        n
		
.group о
        о        o
		о  (_   'o
		о  (L01_ 'o
		о  (L01L01_ 'o
		
.group п
        п        p
		пъ       p?
		
.group р
        р        r
		
.group с
        с        S
		
.group т
        т        t
		тъ       t?
		
.group у
        у        w
		у  (_   'u
		у  (L01_ 'u
		у  (L01L01_ 'u
		
.group ф
        ф        f
		
.group х
        х        x
		хъ       x?
		
.group ц
        ц        ts
		цъ       ts?
		
.group ч
        ч        tS
		чъ       tS?
		
.group ш
        ш        S
		
.group щ
        щ        StS
		
.group ъ
        ъ        ?
		
.group ы
        ы        I
		ы  (_   'I
		ы  (L01_ 'I
		ы  (L01L01_ 'I
		
.group ь
        ь        ?
		
.group э
        э        e
		э  (_   'e
		э  (L01_ 'e
		э  (L01L01_ 'e
		
.group ю
        ю        ju
		ю  (_    j'u
		ю  (L01_ j'u
		ю  (L01L01_ j'u
		
.group я
        я        ja
	    я  (_    j'a
	    я  (L01_ j'a
	    я  (L01L01_ j'a
